North Carolina, session 2025, HB842.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-76.45(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The governing body of a public school unit shall adopt procedures to notify a parent
of the following:
(1) At the beginning of each school year, notice of each health care service offered
at his or her child's school and the means for the parent to provide consent for
any specific service. A parent's consent to a health care service does not waive
the parent's right to access his or her child's educational records or health
records or to be notified of changes in his or her child's services or monitoring.
A health care service under this subdivision does not include a health care
screening.
(2) At the beginning of each school year, procedures to exercise the parental
remedies provided by G.S. 115C-76.60.
(3) Prior to administration to students in kindergarten through third grade, a copy
of any student well-being questionnaire or health screening form and the
means for the parent to consent to the use of the questionnaire or form for his
or her child.
(4) Prior to or contemporaneous with changes, notice of changes in services or
monitoring related to his or her child's mental, emotional, or physical health
or well-being and the school's ability to provide a safe and supportive learning
environment for that child.
(5) Prior to any changes in the name or pronoun used for a student in school
records or by school personnel, notice to the parent of the change.
(6) Notice of health care screenings as provided in G.S. 115C-76.46."
SECTION 2. Part 4 of Article 7B of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-76.46. School health care screenings.
(a) A health care screening is one of the following screenings:
(1) Vision screening.
(2) Hearing screening.
(3) Dental screening.
(4) Developmental screening for cognition, language, and motor function
conducted in accordance with G.S. 115C-83.5(a).
*H842-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) A public school unit may conduct a health care screening without parental consent
but shall provide a parent notice (i) at the beginning of the school year on all screenings to be
conducted and (ii) of the results of those screenings for their child."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 842-First Edition